Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1396.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 43, to read: CHAPTER 43 RIGHT TO CONTRACEPTION ACT ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE36-4301. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Contraception" means an action taken to prevent pregnancy, including the use of contraceptives or fertility-awareness based methods, and sterilization procedures. 2. "Contraceptive" means any drug, device or biological product intended for use in the prevention of pregnancy, whether specifically intended to prevent pregnancy or for other health needs, that is legally marketed under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, such as oral contraceptives, long-acting reversible contraceptives, emergency contraceptives, internal and external condoms, injectables, vaginal barrier methods, transdermal patches and vaginal rings or any other contraceptives. 3. "Health professional" means a health care provider who is certified or licensed pursuant to title 32 and who has prescribing authority. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-4302. Contraceptives; contraception; rights A. A person has a right to obtain contraceptives and to engage in contraception, and a health professional has a corresponding right to provide contraceptives and information related to contraception. B. The rights prescribed in subsection A of this section may not be limited or otherwise infringed through any limit or requirement that does either of the following: 1. Expressly, effectively, implicitly or as implemented singles out the providing of contraceptives or contraception-related information, health professionals who provide contraceptives or contraception-related information or health care facilities in which contraceptives or contraception-related information is provided. 2. Impedes access to contraceptives or contraception-related information. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-4303. Limits of article This article does not do either of the following: 1. Authorize this state or any political subdivision of this state to interfere with a health professional's ability to provide contraceptives or contraception-related information or a patient's ability to obtain contraceptives or to engage in contraception. 2. Allow or sanction the conduct of any sterilization procedure without the patient's voluntary and informed consent. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Arizona Right to Contraception Act".